src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/V-I-I-maanikinako_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  +ero+:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.+fst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.+fst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - maanikinako - ok : # -m inanimate intransitive verb, appear AEW NA1
     PS/niit+maanikinako+VII+Ind+0Sg: niitanikinakowa
     maanikinako+VII+Ind+0Pl: maanikinakoyi
     PS/iik+PS/oomok+maanikinako+VII+Ind+0Sg: iikoomokanikinakowa
     PS/iik+PS/ohpo+maanikinako+VII+Ind+0Sg: iikohpaanikinakowa
     PS/ii+PS/ohkana+PS/omia'nist+maanikinako+VII+Ind+0Pl: iihkanaomia'nistanikinakoyi
     PS/yaak+PS/isttsikohpo+maanikinako+VII+Ind+0Sg: aaksisttsikohpaanikinakowa
     PS/yaak+PS/ipiiw+maanikinako+VII+Ind+0Sg: aaksipiiwanikinakowa
     PS/iik+PS/aanist+maanikinako+VII+Ind+0Sg: iikanistanikinakowa
     PS/sikotahko+maanikinako+VII+Ind+0Sg: sikotahkaanikinakowa
     PS/ii+PS/sstsaap+maanikinako+VII+Ind+0Sg: iisstsaapanikinakowa
     PS/ii+PS/oohsi+maanikinako+VII+Ind+0Sg: issanikinakowa
     PS/ipiiw+maanikinako+VII+Ind+0Sg: piiwanikinakowa
     PS/a+PS/apoyi+maanikinako+VII+Ind+0Sg: aapoyanikinakowa
     PS/yaak+PS/aanist+maanikinako+VII+Ind+0Sg: aakanistanikinakowa
     PS/yaak+PS/apoyi+maanikinako+VII+Ind+0Sg: aakapoyanikinakowa
